Massachusetts, session 194th, S2712.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. In the town of Yarmouth, the Natural Resources Division employees who 
are certified police officers pursuant to M.G.L. c. 6E, shall be Group 4 employees pursuant to 
M.G.L. c. 32  § 3(2)(g). Notwithstanding any provision in M.G.L. c. 32, § 1-28, inclusive to the 
contrary, all prior credible service rendered before the effective date of this act rendered by the 
Natural Resources Division employees as of the date of this act will be considered Group 4 
service.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage, or take any other action relative 
thereto.